gl_ES.dic
achegador/10,13
acreditábel/12
acusón/10,15
adaptación/10
adquiridor/10,13
adxunto/10,14
africáner/11
agresor/10,13
albanel/12
albóndega/10
algareón/10,15
alintelado/10,14
amañador/10,13
americanista/10
anal/12
anexo/10,14
anovador/10,13
antigüidade/10
anulatorio/10,14
aplacábel/12
apuntador/10,13
argallada/10
arrevesado/10,14
arxidal/12
aseteador/10,13
atabacado/10,14
atusmón/10,15
austrohúngaro/10,14
autorizábel/12
avasalador/10,13
bacterioloxía/10
balandrán/10,15
barbán/10,15
bárbaro/10,14
barrigán/10,15
belicista/10
bemol/12
berrón/10,15
best-seller/11
bicador/10,13
biónico/10,14
bóer/11
bordador/10,13
borrachón/10,15
botarel/12
brollón/10,15
bufiñón/10,15
buleirán/10,15
burgalés/10,14
burrán/10,15
buxán/10,15
cabezón/10,15
cabriolé/10
cachán/10,15
cadaval/12
cagán/10,15
calculador/10,13
camberrano/10,14
canavela/10
canelán/10,15
capón/10,15
carcamán/10,15
cardial/12
carolinxio/10,14
carrandán/10,15
carretada/10
carroulán/10,15
catador/10,13
celandés/10,14
celestial/12
centrista/10
certificador/10,13
chambón/10,15
chárter/11
chavellón/10,15
chosco/10,14
chufón/10,15
cianofícea/10
cismón/10,15
claustral/12
cocoso/10,14
codicilar/10
coidador/10,13
compatíbel/12
compoñedor/10,13
concienciudo/10,14
coñecedor/10,13
confundíbel/12
congolés/10,14
construtor/10,13
contrasinal/12
contravalor/10
coordinador/10,13
cornán/10,15
córner/11
corrixíbel/12
corroborativo/10,14
creatividade/10
cubil/12
cultivador/10,13
curativo/10,14
darwinismo/10
degoxón/10,15
delimitador/10,13
demostrábel/12
desaprensivo/10,14
desatinado/10,14
desbaratador/10,13
desesperanzador/10,13
desinencial/12
desorientador/10,13
devolutivo/10,14
dicidor/10,13
dídimo/10,14
dirixíbel/12
divulgador/10,13
dodecafonía/10
dublinés/10,14
ducal/12
elaborador/10,13
embriagante/10
emulador/10,13
eneolítico/10,14
entenrecedor/10,13
enumeración/10
envexábel/12
escamoteador/10,13
escáner/11
escorregadizo/10,14
esfera/10
español/12,13
esquirol/12
estándar/11
estona/10
estragador/10,13
estraño/10,14
explorábel/12
explorador/10,13
extático/10,14
falseador/10,13
faltón/10,15
fatal/12
fedellón/10,15
fermoso/10,14
feroz/10
flexíbel/12
fodedor/10,13
folgazán/10,15
foncho/10,14
fox-terrier/11
fumigador/10,13
fundo/10,14
funxiforme/10
furriel/12
galbán/10,15
gángster/11
geyser/11
globo/10
globoso/10,14
gobernador/10,13
gorón/10,15
groggy/11
gurrón/10,15
habitual/12
halitose/10
hámster/11
harmonioso/10,14
hidropónico/10,14
himeneo/10
hippy/11
humidificador/10,13
humoral/12
húngaro/10,14
ien/10
imperturbábel/12
impulsor/10,13
inalcanzábel/12
incoercíbel/12
inconcuso/10,14
incorporal/12
incorruptible/10
indiferenciábel/12
inesquecíbel/12
inguinal/12
iniciador/10,13
inmunolóxico/10,14
inopinábel/12
inoportunidade/10
insultador/10,13
insuperábel/12
intolerábel/12
invocador/10,13
iraniano/10,14
irmandiño/10,14
irrealizábel/12
irrompíbel/12
júnior/11
khmer/11
lambón/10,15
lanuxe/10
larapeteiro/10,14
larpán/10,15
levantador/10,13
librábel/12
lidro/10
limnófilo/10,14
locador/10,13
lombán/10,15
lupa/10
macrocósmico/10,14
magallón/10,15
mandil/12
mangallón/10,15
mangoneador/10,13
manta/10
mariñeiro/10,14
máster/11
mazador/10,13
mazairal/12
megavatio/10
mesocéfalo/10,14
miañón/10,15
mielínico/10,14
minerval/12
míster/11
mitógrafo/10,14
monofonía/10
mordedor/10,13
moscatel/12
moscovítico/10,14
murón/10,15
nacarino/10,14
neozoico/10,14
nobelo/10
obtuso/10,14
occidental/12
ocupador/10,13
orellán/10,15
ortodáctilo/10,14
ovárico/10,14
pachán/10,15
pandémico/10,14
papaleisón/10,15
papón/10,15
parenteral/12
pastrán/10,15
patrístico/10,14
pechador/10,13
peideiro/10,14
peleirón/10,15
perplexo/10,14
pillabán/10,15
piñeiral/12
plutocracia/10
pneumogástrico/10,14
pointer/11
póinter/11
póker/11
pólder/11
porfión/10,15
posesor/10,13
póster/11
prealpino/10,14
preternatural/12
prometedor/10,13
promisión/10
prosmeiro/10,14
quásar/11
queimón/10,15
rabioso/10,14
ravioli/10
razoador/10,13
real/12
refungón/10,15
regador/10,13
remuiñado/10,14
rescindíbel/12
respondón/10,15
retropropulsor/10,13
reválida/10
roñón/10,15
sabichón/10,15
saltador/10,13
sánscrito/10,14
sé/10
secretarial/12
servidor/10,13
sexy/11
sidecar/11
skípper/11
sobranceiro/10,14
sobrenatural/12
solteirón/10,15
somación/10
stárter/11
sustentador/10,13
tamboril/12
telecinésico/10,14
temor/10
terrier/11
tolambrón/10,15
topón/10,15
tráiler/11
transferidor/10,13
transplantábel/12
trasnada/10
treceavo/10,14
varo/10,14
varredor/10,13
vectorial/12
ventrudo/10,14
vergallán/10,15
wéber/11
wélter/11
wínchester/11
xeriátrico/10,14
xestual/12
xogador/10,13
xograresco/10,14
zoupón/10,15
